Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) The Agricultural Overtime  Award Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Agricultural Overtime Award  Fund shall
be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred or credited to the fund by the Legislative
Assembly;
(b) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(c) Other amounts from any source transferred or otherwise credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the following purposes:
(a) Paying the actual costs incurred by the department in developing and  administering section
1 [of this 2023 Act ], chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2023 ; and
(b) Carrying out the provisions of section  1 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2023,
in accordance with section 447 (1), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022.
(4) Any moneys remaining in the fund  on [ June 30, 2025 ] January 2, 2027 , shall be transferred
to the General Fund.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding ORS 541.937, the amount of $3,000,000 is transferred from
the Flexible Incentives Account to the General Fund for  general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on May 31, 2027.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding section 6, chapter  25, Oregon Laws 2023, the amount of
$15,000,000 is transferred from the Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home  and
CHIPS Fund to the General Fund for general governmental purposes.  The transfer shall be
made on May 31, 2027.
SECTION 3a. Section 3 of  this 2025 Act does not become operative unless House Bill 2322
becomes law.
SECTION 4. The Summer Learning Program Account established under  ORS 327.496 is
abolished. Any moneys remaining in the account on the operative date  of this section shall
be transferred to the General Fund for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 5. ORS 327.496 is repealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 960 (SB 960-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. Section 4 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 327.496 by section 5 of this
2025 Act become operative on May 31, 2027.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding ORS 656.605, the amount  of $14,680,000 is transferred from
the Workers’ Benefit Fund to the Wage Security Fund established under ORS 652.409.
SECTION 8.  ORS 180.095, as amended by section 5, chapter 69, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
180.095. (1) The Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account is created
in the General Fund. All moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Department
of Justice and may be used to pay for only the following activities:
(a) Restitution and refunds in proceedings described in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(b) Consumer and business  education relating to the laws governing antitrust and unlawful trade
practices; and
(c) Personal services, travel, meals,  lodging and all other costs and expenses incurred by the
department in  investigating, preparing, commencing and prosecuting the following actions and suits,
and enforcing judgments, settlements, compromises and assurances of voluntary compliance  arising
out of the following actions and suits:
(A) Actions and suits under the state and federal antitrust laws;
(B) Actions and suits under ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.656;
(C) Actions commenced under ORS 59.331;
(D) Actions and suits under ORS 180.750 to 180.785;
(E) Actions and suits under ORS 646A.025;
(F) Actions commenced under ORS 646A.589; [ and]
(G) Actions and suits under section 3, chapter 69, Oregon Laws 2024[ .]; and
(H) Actions and suits commenced under ORS 180.060.
(2) Moneys in the Department of Justice Protection and Education  Revolving Account are not
subject to allotment. Upon request of the Attorney General, the State Treasurer shall create sub-
accounts within the account for the purposes of managing moneys in  the account and allocating
those moneys to the activities described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, all sums of money received by the Department of Jus-
tice under a judgment, settlement, compromise or assurance of voluntary compliance,  including
damages, restitution, refunds, attorney fees, costs,  disbursements and other recoveries, but excluding
civil penalties under ORS 646.642, in proceedings described in subsection  (1)(c) of this section shall,
upon receipt, be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Department of Justice  Pro-
tection and Education Revolving Account. However, if the action  or suit was based on an expendi-
ture or loss from a public body or a dedicated fund, the amount of  such expenditure or loss, after
deduction of attorney fees and expenses awarded to the department by  the court or agreed to by the
parties, if any, shall be  credited to the public body or dedicated fund and the remainder thereof
credited to the Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account.
(4) If the Department of Justice recovers restitution  or refunds in a proceeding described in
subsection (1)(c) of this section, and the  department cannot determine the persons to whom the
restitution or refunds should be paid or  the amount of the restitution or refund payable to individual
claimants is de minimis, the restitution or refunds may not be deposited in the Department of Justice
Protection and Education Revolving Account and shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(5) Before April 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Justice shall report to the Joint
Committee on Ways and Means:
(a) The department’s projection of the balance in the Department of Justice Protection  and Ed-
ucation Revolving Account at the end of the biennium in which the report is made  and at the end
of the following biennium;
(b) The amount of the balance held for restitution and refunds;
(c) An estimate of the department’s anticipated costs and expenses under  subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section for the biennium in which the report is  made and for the following biennium; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 960 (SB 960-A) Page 2
(d) Any judgment,  settlement, compromise or other recovery, the proceeds of which are used for
purposes other than:
(A) For  deposit into the Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account;
or
(B) For payment of legal costs related  to the judgment, settlement, compromise or other recov-
ery.
(6) The Joint Committee on Ways and Means, after consideration  of recommendations made by
the Department of Justice, shall use the  information reported under subsection (5) of this section to
determine an appropriate balance for the revolving account.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding ORS 293.146, the transfer described in ORS 293.146  (2) of
moneys to the Oregon Rainy Day Fund may not be made  for the biennium ending June 30,
2025.
SECTION 10.  ORS 285B.420 is amended to read:
285B.420. (1) The Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority may provide  financial assistance in
the form of loans or grants for a levee project to:
(a) [ Drainage districts organized under ORS chapter 547 ] Municipalities;
(b) Corporations or companies for  drainage or flood control organized under ORS chapter 554;
and
(c) For-profit or nonprofit entities  and individuals engaged in the ownership, construction, in-
spection, accreditation, certification or repair of levees.
(2) To qualify for financial assistance  under this section, the [ district] municipality, corporation,
company, entity or individual must demonstrate, and the authority must find, that the levee project
substantially contributes to the improvement, expansion or repair of the state’s or  a municipality’s
infrastructure system and is essential for the  use or development of farm, industrial or commercial
land in Oregon.
(3) Levee projects that receive financial assistance under this section are subject to  the pro-
visions and requirements of ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482, if applicable.
SECTION 11.
The amendments to ORS 285B.420 by section 10  of this 2025 Act apply to
financial assistance provided under ORS 285B.420 before, on or after the effective date of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 12.  ORS 411.139 is amended to read:
411.139. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible [ agency] entity ” means an  [agency] entity that has , or previously had,  contracted
with the United States Department of State  under 8 U.S.C. [ 1522(c)] 1522(b) or (c)  to provide initial
resettlement and case management services to refugees.
(b) “Refugee” means an individual who is not  a United States citizen, who has been in the
United States for 60 months or less and who is any of the following:
(A) A refugee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1157.
(B) An asylee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1158.
(C) A Cuban or Haitian entrant as defined in 45 C.F.R. 401.2.
(D) A parolee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1182(d)(5).
(E) An Amerasian immigrant lawfully admitted to the United States who  is described in 8 U.S.C.
1612(a)(2)(A)(v).
(F) A victim of a severe form of trafficking in  persons and the victim’s family members who are
eligible for benefits and services from federal and state programs under 22 U.S.C. 7105(b)(1)(A).
(G) An Iraqi  or an Afghan citizen who is a principal noncitizen provided with the status of
special immigrant by the United States Department of Homeland Security under:
(i) Section 1059(a) of the National Defense Authorization  Act for Fiscal Year 2006, P.L. 109-163,
119 Stat. 3444;
(ii) Section 1244(b) of the Refugee Crisis in Iraq Act of 2007, P.L. 110-181, 122 Stat. 397; or
(iii) Section 602(b) of the Afghan Allies Protection Act of 2009, P.L. 111-8, 123 Stat. 807.
Enrolled Senate Bill 960 (SB 960-A) Page 3
(2) The Department  of Human Services shall award grants to eligible [ agencies] entities to
provide the following services to refugees residing in this state, for up to 24 months:
(a) Assisting refugees with department programs by:
(A) Referring refugees to  the department within three days of the refugee’s arrival in this state;
(B) Completing applications for assistance;
(C) Transporting the refugee to the initial appointments with the department;
(D) Providing to the department all necessary  eligibility information known to the eligible
[agency] entity ; and
(E) Coordinating services of the department with other social service agencies.
(b) Assisting refugees with:
(A) Navigating the health care and mental health systems, including  providing assistance in
applying for medical assistance;
(B) Accessing housing assistance and finding stable housing;
(C) Setting up utilities and paying utility bills;
(D) Issues with landlords;
(E) Navigating legal or criminal issues including services for victims of crime;
(F) Accessing in-home services including  parenting assistance, English as a second language
instruction, medical and psychosocial support; and
(G) Navigating the culture of the United States.
(c) Providing transportation to appointments.
(d) Training refugees on using public transportation.
(e) Providing immigration assistance and referrals.
(f) Advocating on behalf of refugees regarding domestic violence, federal laws and hate crimes.
(g) Providing refugees with interpretation services and assistance with access to language  ser-
vices.
(h) Providing  referrals for refugees to culturally specific support groups and services, including
religious organizations.
(i) Pairing refugees with volunteers for English as a second language training  and ongoing lan-
guage support.
(j) Providing support to refugees in budgeting and achieving financial literacy.
(k) Identifying refugees’ employment skills and providing  referrals to employment skills training
and other job support services.
(L) Problem solving with refugees and assisting refugees with life skills development.
(m) Ensuring that refugees have access  to psychosocial support and emotional wellness educa-
tion.
(n) Coordinating medical services for refugees including referring to and  coordinating with
agencies that determine eligibility for disability benefits.
(o) Providing family preservation services, legal services and social service support for  domestic
violence and child welfare issues.
(p) Assisting newly arrived refugee children in accessing services to strengthen the  children’s
academic performance and successful integration into the community.
(q) Other services necessary to assist refugees in accessing  programs administered by the de-
partment.
SECTION 13.
 Section 3, chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Early Learning Council shall develop and  implement rules providing criteria for
eligibility based on ORS 329A.500 (4)(a)(C) no later than July 1, 2025.
(2) The council shall develop and implement rules providing criteria for eligibility  based on ORS
329A.500 (4)(a)(D) no later than July 1, [ 2027] 2029.
SECTION 14. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 960 (SB 960-A) Page 4
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 960 (SB 960-A) Page 5